Texas statutes.
AGRICULTURE CODE

TITLE 6. PRODUCTION, PROCESSING, AND SALE OF ANIMAL PRODUCTS

SUBTITLE C. CONTROL OF ANIMAL DISEASES AND PESTS

CHAPTER 165. CONTROL OF DISEASES OF SWINE

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 165.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "commission" means the Texas Animal Health Commission.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1428, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Without reference to the amendment of this section, this section was repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 37, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 165.002. TREATMENT. Except as otherwise provided by law, a representative of the commission or a person authorized by the commission may vaccinate, inoculate, or treat hogs with classical swine fever virus or serum or with another remedy.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1428, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 623 (S.B. 1997), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 165.003. SALE OR DISTRIBUTION OF UNATTENUATED CLASSICAL SWINE FEVER VIRUS. (a) A person may not sell, offer for sale, barter, exchange, or give away unattenuated classical swine fever virus.

(b) This section does not prohibit:

(1) acquisition, propagation, manufacture, or use of unattenuated classical swine fever virus by, and on the licensed premises of, a firm operating under a United States veterinary license issued by the secretary of agriculture of the United States;

(2) manufacture of unattenuated classical swine fever virus by a firm operating under a United States veterinary license for the sale or distribution in states in which use of attenuated classical swine fever virus is permitted; or

(3) keeping vaccine on hand for purely experimental or research activities by a recognized college, university, school, or laboratory engaged in research activities.

(c) In this section, "unattenuated classical swine fever virus" means a classical swine fever virus that has not been modified or inactivated.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1428, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 623 (S.B. 1997), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER B. COOPERATIVE PROGRAM FOR DISEASE ERADICATION

Sec. 165.021. COOPERATION WITH U.S. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE. The commission may cooperate with the United States Department of Agriculture in the eradication of vesicular exanthema, foot and mouth disease of swine, classical swine fever, and other diseases of swine.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1429, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 623 (S.B. 1997), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Text of section as amended by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 35

For text of section as amended by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 623 (S.B. 1997), Sec. 4, see other Sec. 165.022.

Sec. 165.022. METHOD OF DISEASE ERADICATION. Following notice and public hearing, the commission shall adopt rules for the enforcement of this subchapter, including rules providing for the manner, method, and system of eradicating swine diseases. The commission may by a two-thirds vote adopt rules more stringent than the rules relating to minimum standards for cooperative programs adopted by the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1429, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 35, eff. September 1, 2021.

Text of section as amended by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 623 (S.B. 1997), Sec. 4

For text of section as amended by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 35, see other Sec. 165.022.

Sec. 165.022. METHOD OF DISEASE ERADICATION. (a) Following notice and public hearing, the commission shall adopt rules for the enforcement of this subchapter, including rules providing for the manner, method, and system of eradicating swine diseases.

(b) The commission may by a two-thirds vote adopt rules under this section that are more stringent than the minimum standards for cooperative programs adopted by the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1429, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 623 (S.B. 1997), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 165.023. USE OF BIOLOGICS. The commission shall adopt rules governing the use of biologics as a protection against dissemination of communicable swine diseases.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1429, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 165.026. FEEDING GARBAGE TO SWINE. (a) A person may not feed restricted garbage to swine or provide restricted garbage to any person for the purpose of feeding swine, except that a facility operated by the Texas Department of Criminal Justice may feed restricted garbage to swine if the garbage is properly treated in accordance with applicable federal requirements.

(b) A person may feed unrestricted garbage to swine only if the person first registers with and secures a permit from the commission.

(c) The commission may adopt rules for registration under this section, including rules providing for registration issuance, revocation, and renewal, disease tests, inspections, bookkeeping, and appropriate handling and treatment of unrestricted garbage. Registration with the commission shall be made on forms prescribed by the commission, and the commission shall furnish those forms on request. The commission may impose a registration fee not to exceed $25 a year.

(d) The commission or the executive director of the commission may issue an emergency administrative order to suspend a registration under this section or require the immediate quarantine and closure of a garbage feeding facility if the commission or the executive director determines that the practice presents a danger to public health or the livestock industry, including any danger related to an insect infestation or the transmission of a disease. An order must expire not later than the end of the second month after the effective date of the order.

(e) The commission or the commissioner may issue an order prohibiting the feeding of restricted garbage to swine in all or part of the state if the commission or the commissioner determines that the practice presents a danger to public health or the livestock industry, including any danger related to an insect infestation or the transmission of a disease.

(f) This section does not apply to an individual who feeds unrestricted garbage from the individual's own household, farm, or ranch to swine owned by the individual.

(g) The commission, in cooperation with the department and any other appropriate state agencies and political subdivisions, shall:

(1) attempt to inform each supplier of restricted garbage and each individual feeding garbage to swine of the provisions of this section;

(2) assist garbage feeding facilities and individuals feeding garbage to swine in identifying a source for obtaining unrestricted garbage; and

(3) adopt measures designed to ensure compliance with this section.

(h) In this section:

(1) "Restricted garbage" includes:

(A) the animal refuse matter and the putrescible animal waste resulting from handling, preparing, cooking, or consuming food containing all or part of an animal carcass;

(B) the animal waste material by-products or commingled animal and vegetable waste material by-products of a restaurant, kitchen, cookery, or slaughterhouse; and

(C) refuse accumulations of animal matter or commingled animal and vegetable matter, liquid or otherwise.

(2) "Unrestricted garbage" includes the vegetable, fruit, dairy, or baked goods refuse matter and vegetable waste and refuse accumulations resulting from handling, preparing, cooking, or consuming food containing only vegetable matter, liquid or otherwise.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1430, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 764, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1207, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 165.027. ENTRY POWER. (a) A representative of the commission, including a member of the commission, is entitled to enter the premises of any person for the purpose of inspecting swine or the heating or cooking equipment required by this subchapter or for the purpose of performing another duty under this subchapter.

(b) A person may not refuse to permit an inspection authorized by this subchapter.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1430, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

SUBCHAPTER C. PENALTIES

Sec. 165.041. GENERAL PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person violates a provision of Subchapter B of this chapter or a rule adopted under that subchapter.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor.

(c) A person commits a separate offense for each day of violation.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1430, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 51, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 548, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 165.042. SALE OF UNATTENUATED CLASSICAL SWINE FEVER VIRUS. (a) A person commits an offense if the person violates Section 165.003 of this code.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1431, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 52, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 623 (S.B. 1997), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2021.